Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.201

Names qualified to appear on election ballot.

The names of candidates certified by the secretary of state or the county canvassing board as qualified to appear on the general election shall be printed on the general election ballot.

If a primary for an office was held, no name of any candidate shall be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election unless it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the secretary of state, or (2) the county canvassing board.

Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder, a candidate's name shall not appear on a ballot more than once.

[ 2013 c 11 s 46; 2004 c 271 s 171.]